Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.050

License fee on application.

The application for an annual license to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, or advertise for sale, trade, barter, or to give as an inducement for the sale of another product, milk, cream, or skim milk for animal food consumption shall be accompanied by a license fee of twenty-five dollars.

[ 1961 c 285 s 5.]